Utah statutes.
17C-1-413.   Base taxable value for new tax.
For purposes of calculating tax increment with respect to a tax that a taxing
entity levies for the first time after the effective date of the project area
plan, the base taxable value shall be used, subject to any adjustments under
Section 17C-1-408.
